Illinois, session 104th, SB2998.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-615 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-615)8    Sec. 2605-615. Illinois Forensic Science Commission.9    (a) Creation. There is created within the Illinois State 10Police the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.11    (b) Duties and purpose. The Commission shall:12        (1) Provide guidance to ensure the efficient delivery 13    of forensic services and the sound practice of forensic 14    science.15        (2) Provide a forum for discussions between forensic 16    science stakeholders to improve communication and 17    coordination and to monitor the important issues impacting 18    all stakeholders.19        (3) Take a systems-based approach in reviewing all 20    aspects of the delivery of forensic services and the sound 21    practice of forensic science with the goal of reducing or 22    eliminating the factors and inefficiencies that contribute 23    to backlogs and errors, with a focus on education and   SB2998- 2 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1    training, funding, hiring, procurement, and other aspects 2    identified by the Commission.3        (4) Review significant non-conformities with the sound 4    practice of forensic science documented by each publicly 5    funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic laboratory and offer 6    recommendations for the correction thereof.7        (5) Subject to appropriation, provide educational, 8    research, and professional training opportunities for 9    practicing forensic scientists, police officers, judges, 10    State's Attorneys and Assistant State's Attorneys, Public 11    Defenders, and defense attorneys comporting with the sound 12    practice of forensic science.13        (6) Collect and analyze information related to the 14    impact of current laws, rules, policies, and practices on 15    forensic crime laboratories and the practice of forensic 16    science; evaluate the impact of those laws, rules, 17    policies, and practices on forensic crime laboratories and 18    the practice of forensic science; identify new policies 19    and approaches, together with changes in science, and 20    technology; and make recommendations for changes to those 21    laws, rules, policies, and practices that will yield 22    better results in the criminal justice system consistent 23    with the sound practice of forensic science.24        (7) Perform such other studies or tasks pertaining to 25    forensic crime laboratories as may be requested by the 26    General Assembly by resolution or the Governor, and   SB2998- 3 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1    perform such other functions as may be required by law or 2    as are necessary to carry out the purposes and goals of the 3    Commission prescribed in this Section.4        (8) Ensure that adequate resources and facilities are 5    available for carrying out the changes proposed in 6    legislation, rules, or policies and that rational 7    priorities are established for the use of those resources. 8    To do so, the Commission may prepare statements to the 9    Governor and General Assembly identifying the fiscal and 10    practical effects of proposed legislation, rules, or 11    policy changes. Such statements may include, but are not 12    limited to: the impact on present levels of staffing and 13    resources; a professional opinion on the practical value 14    of the change or changes; the increase or decrease the 15    number of crime laboratories; the increase or decrease the 16    cost of operating crime laboratories; the impact on 17    efficiencies and caseloads; other information, including 18    but not limited to, facts, data, research, and science 19    relevant to the legislation, rule, or policy; the direct 20    or indirect alteration in any process involving or used by 21    crime laboratories of such proposed legislation, rules, or 22    policy changes; an analysis of the impact, either directly 23    or indirectly, on the technology, improvements, or 24    practices of forensic analyses for use in criminal 25    proceedings; together with the direct or indirect impact 26    on headcount, space, equipment, instruments,   SB2998- 4 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1    accreditation, the volume of cases for analysis, 2    scientific controls, and quality assurance.3    (c) Members. The Commission shall be composed of the 4Director of the Illinois State Police, or his or her designee, 5together with the following members appointed for a term of 4 6years by the Governor with the advice and consent of the 7Senate:8        (1) One crime laboratory director or administrator 9    from each publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic 10    laboratory system.11        (2) One member with experience in the admission of 12    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 13    representing prosecutors.14        (3) One member with experience in the admission of 15    forensic evidence in trials from a statewide association 16    representing criminal defense attorneys.17        (4) Three forensic scientists with bench work 18    background from various forensic disciplines (e.g., DNA, 19    chemistry, pattern evidence, etc.).20        (5) One retired circuit court judge or associate 21    circuit court judge with criminal trial experience, 22    including experience in the admission of forensic evidence 23    in trials.24        (6) One academic specializing in the field of forensic 25    sciences.26        (7) One or more community representatives (e.g.,   SB2998- 5 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1    victim advocates, innocence project organizations, sexual 2    assault examiners, etc.).3        (8) One member who is a medical examiner or coroner. 4    The Governor shall designate one of the members of the 5Commission to serve as the chair of the Commission. Beginning 6January 1, 2026, the Governor shall designate the chair of the 7Commission for a 2-year term. The members of the Commission 8shall elect from their number such other officers as they may 9determine. Members of the Commission shall serve without 10compensation, but may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses 11incurred in the performance of their duties from funds 12appropriated for that purpose.13    (d) Subcommittees. The Commission may form subcommittees 14to study specific issues identified under paragraph (3) of 15subsection (b), including, but not limited to, subcommittees 16on education and training, procurement, funding and hiring. Ad 17hoc subcommittees may also be convened to address other 18issues. Such subcommittees shall meet as needed to complete 19their work, and shall report their findings back to the 20Commission. Subcommittees shall include members of the 21Commission, and may also include non-members such as forensic 22science stakeholders and subject matter experts.23    (e) Meetings. The Commission shall meet quarterly, at the 24call of the chairperson. Facilities for meeting, whether 25remotely or in person, shall be provided for the Commission by 26the Illinois State Police.  SB2998- 6 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1    (e-5) Complaint reporting by publicly funded ISO 17025 2accredited forensic laboratories. All State and local publicly 3funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic laboratory systems, 4including, but not limited to, the DuPage County Forensic 5Science Center, the Northeastern Illinois Regional Crime 6Laboratory, and the Illinois State Police, shall report to the 7Commission any complaint received that alleges a significant 8non-conformity with the efficient delivery of forensic 9services and the sound practice of forensic science within 30 10days of becoming aware of the alleged significant 11non-conformity or deficient method. A report under this 12subsection shall include the nature and extent of the 13non-conformity or deficient method alleged and whether any 14corrective actions have been implemented or will be 15implemented to address the alleged non-conformity or deficient 16method. 17    (f) Annual reporting Reporting by publicly funded ISO 1817025 accredited forensic laboratories. All State and local 19publicly funded ISO 17025 accredited forensic laboratory 20systems, including, but not limited to, the DuPage County 21Forensic Science Center, the Northeastern Illinois Regional 22Crime Laboratory, and the Illinois State Police, shall 23annually provide to the Commission a report summarizing its 24significant non-conformities with the efficient delivery of 25forensic services and the sound practice of forensic science. 26The report will identify: each significant non-conformity or   SB2998- 7 -LRB104 18735 TRT 32178 b1deficient method; how the non-conformity or deficient method 2was detected; the nature and extent of the non-conformity or 3deficient method; all corrective actions implemented to 4address the non-conformity or deficient method; and an 5analysis of the effectiveness of the corrective actions taken. 6The report shall include all complaints reported to the 7Commission under subsection (e-5) of this Section. 8    (g) Definition. As used in this Section, "Commission" 9means the Illinois Forensic Science Commission.10(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24; 11104-24, eff. 1-1-26.)